Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.140

Application of chapter to birthing centers operated by certain religious organizations.

Nothing in this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial and nursing care of patients in any birthing center as defined in this chapter, conducted for or by members of a recognized religious sect, denomination, or organization which in accordance with its creed, tenets, or principles depends for healing upon prayer in the practice of religion, nor shall the existence of any of the above conditions militate against the licensing of such facility.

[ 2000 c 93 s 40; 1951 c 168 s 15.]